Tennessee, session 114, SB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-402(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "March 31" and substituting instead "March 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1167
003260
- 1 -